apertium-olo.olo.lexc
LEXICON A_JÄLGI  !!= @CODE@ jälgi:jälg
!! front vowel
!! gradation Yes
:%{front%}        NMN_JÄLGI  ;
%<com%>p:%{front%}emb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Der/in%<sup%>erl:%{front%}i NMN_ENIN        ;



!! !TWO-SYLLABLE WORD WITH CONSONANT-FINAL STEM
LEXICON A_VANUIN !!= @CODE@ vanuin:vanui
:%{back%} NMN_VANUIN	 ;

LEXICON A_VAŽEN !!= @CODE@ važen:važe
:%{back%} NMN_VAŽEN   ;


LEXICON A_LÄMMIN !!= @CODE@ lämmin:lämbi
:%{front%}	NMN_LÄMMIN   ;

LEXICON A_TAIGIN !!= @CODE@ taigin:taigin
:%{back%}	NMN_TAIGIN   ;

LEXICON A_SALBOIN !!= @CODE@ salboin:salboi
:%{back%} NMN_SALBOIN ;

LEXICON A_ENIN !!= @CODE@ enin:eni
:%{front%} NMN_ENIN-SG ;
:%{front%} NMN_ENIN-PL ;



LEXICON Adj-NB-i
! These cases are symmetrically marked for number
%<sg%>: Adj-NB-01 ;
%<pl%>:%>i Adj-NB-01 ;
! The next two share the same stem vowel
%<sg%>: SG-ACC/APR/COM/GENSUF ;
%<pl%>: PLNOMSUF ;

LEXICON Adj-NB-loi
! These cases are symmetrically marked for number
%<sg%>: Adj-NB-01 ;
%<pl%>:%>loi Adj-NB-01 ;
! The next two share the same stem vowel
%<sg%>: SG-ACC/APR/COM/GENSUF ;
%<pl%>: PLNOMSUF ;

LEXICON Adj-NB-01
%<ess%>:%^WGStem%>nn%{uy%} K ;
%<tra%>:%^WGStem%>kse K ;
%<ine%>:%^WGStem%>s K ;
%<ela%>:%^WGStem%>s K ;
%<ill%>:%>h K ;
%<ade%>:%^WGStem%>l K ;
%<abl%>:%^WGStem%>l K ;
%<all%>:%^WGStem%>le K ;
%<abe%>:%^WGStem%>tt%{aä%}h K ;
%<abe%>:%^WGStem%>tt%{aä%} K ;
%<abe%>:%^WGStem%>t%{aä%} K ;
%<prl%>:%>či K ;
:%^WGStem%>ll%{uy%}%{oö%} K ;
%<term%>:%^WGStem%>ss%{aä%}h K ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Adverbs 
!  --------------------
!! Olonets-Karelian adverbs compare.

LEXICON ADA_
%<adv%>: # ;
LEXICON ADV_
: K ; 

LEXICON ADV-IS-ELA-WITH-PXSG3 !!= @CODE@ e.g. levälleh
: # ; 

LEXICON ADV-MANNER
+Manner: K ;

LEXICON ADV-SPAT
: K ;

LEXICON ADV-SPAT-IS-ABL
%<abl%>: K ;

LEXICON ADV-SPAT-IS-ADE
%<ade%>: K ;

LEXICON ADV-SPAT-IS-ALL
%<all%>: K ;

LEXICON ADV-TEMP_
%<temp%>: K ;

LEXICON ADV-INDEF-MANNER
%<pri%>ef+Manner: K ;

LEXICON ADV-INDEF-SPAT-IS-INE
%<pri%>ef%<ine%>: K ;

LEXICON ADV-INDEF-SPAT-IS-LAT
%<pri%>ef+Lat: K ;

LEXICON ADV-INDEF-TEMP
%<pri%>ef%<temp%>: K ;

LEXICON ADV-INTERR-MANNER
%<itg%>+Manner: K ;

LEXICON ADV-INTERR-SPAT-IS-INE
%<itg%>%<ine%>: K ;

LEXICON ADV-INTERR-SPAT-IS-ELA
%<itg%>%<ela%>: K ;

LEXICON QNT-ITER
%<ind%>: K ;






! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Clitics
!  --------------------
!! Livvi clitics

LEXICON K
%<enc%>:%>gi WORD-END "also / -kin" ;
!%<enc%>:%>h%{aä%}i WORD-END " / -hAn" ;
%<enc%>:%>häi WORD-END " / -hAn" ;
%<enc%>:%>bo WORD-END " / -pA" ;
%<qu%>:%>go WORD-END " / -kO" ;
WORD-END ; 



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! !!!Noun inflection
! ---------------
!! Livvi nouns inflect in cases.
!! Vowel harmony involves front and back
!! Gradation does not affect all consonants, therefore
!! there are three values: Yes, No and NA (not applicable)


!! !!The file proper

LEXICON N_
%<sg%>%<nom%>%<FIXME%>: # ;

!! !ONE-SYLLABLE VOWEL-FINAL STEMS ENDING IN LONG VOWEL SEGMENT
LEXICON N_SUO !!= @CODE@ suo:suo
!! Gradation: No
!! Harmony: Back
:%{back%} ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; 
:%{back%} NMN_KUU/PII ;

LEXICON N_VYÖ !!= @CODE@ vyö:vyö
!! Gradation: No
!! Harmony: Front
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; 
:%{front%} NMN_VYÖ ;

LEXICON N_KUU !!= @CODE@ kuu:kuu
!! Gradation: No
!! Harmony: Back
:%{back%} ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; 
 N_KUU-SG ;
 N_KUU-PL ;
LEXICON N_KUU-SG
:%{back%} NMN_KUU/PII-SG ;
LEXICON N_KUU-PL
:%{back%} NMN_KUU/PII-PL ;

LEXICON N_PII !!= @CODE@ pii:pii
!! Gradation: No
!! Harmony: front
:%{front%} ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; 
 N_PII-SG ;
 N_PII-PL ;
LEXICON N_PII-SG
:%{front%} NMN_KUU/PII-SG ;
LEXICON N_PII-PL
:%{front%} NMN_KUU/PII-PL ;

LEXICON N_MUA !!= @CODE@ mua:mua
!! Gradation: No
!! Harmony: Back
:%{back%} ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; 
:%{back%} NMN_MUA ;

LEXICON N_PIÄ !!= @CODE@ piä:piä
!! Gradation: No
!! Harmony: Front
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; 
 N_PIÄ-SG ;
 N_PIÄ-PL ;
LEXICON N_PIÄ-SG
:%{front%} NMN_PIÄ-SG ;
LEXICON N_PIÄ-PL
:%{front%} NMN_PIÄ-PL ;

!! !TWO-SYLLABLE VOWEL-FINAL STEMS

LEXICON N_PAPPI !!= @CODE@ pappi:pappi
!! Gradation: Yes
!! Harmony: Back
!! stem final i is retained
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; 
	N_PAPPI-SG ;
	N_PAPPI-PL ;
LEXICON N_PAPPI-SG
:%{back%} NMN_PAPPI/HÄKKI-SG ;
LEXICON N_PAPPI-PL
:%{back%} NMN_PAPPI/HÄKKI-PL ;

LEXICON N_HÄKKI !!= @CODE@ häkki:häkki
!! Gradation: Yes
!! Harmony: Front
!! stem final i is retained
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; 
	N_HÄKKI-SG ;
	N_HÄKKI-PL ;
LEXICON N_HÄKKI-SG
:%{front%} NMN_PAPPI/HÄKKI-SG ;
LEXICON N_HÄKKI-PL
:%{front%} NMN_PAPPI/HÄKKI-PL ;

LEXICON N_LEIRI !!= @CODE@ leiri:leiri
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Front
!! stem	final i is retained
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; 
	N_LEIRI-SG ;
	N_LEIRI-PL ;
LEXICON N_LEIRI-SG
:%{front%} NMN_ARTELI/LEIRI-SG ;
LEXICON N_LEIRI-PL
:%{front%} NMN_ARTELI/LEIRI-PL ;

LEXICON N_PADA !!= @CODE@ pada:pada
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Back
!! stem final a changes to u in Sg Par
!! stem final a changes to o before i in Pl stem
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; 
	N_PADA-SG  ;
	N_PADA-PL  ;
LEXICON N_PADA-SG
:%{back%} NMN_PADA ;
LEXICON N_PADA-PL
:%{back%} NMN_PADA-PL ;


LEXICON N_KALA !!= @CODE@ kala:kala
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!! stem final a changes to u in Sg Par
!! stem final a changes to o before i in Pl stem
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; 
	N_KALA-SG  ;
	N_KALA-PL  ;
LEXICON N_KALA-SG
:%{back%} NMN_KALA ;
LEXICON N_KALA-PL
:%{back%} NMN_KALA-PL ;
LEXICON N-HUM_KALA
: NMN_KALA ;

LEXICON N_OZA !!= @CODE@ oza:oza
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!! stem final a changes to u in Sg Par
!! stem final a changes to 0 before i in Pl stem
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; 
	N_OZA-SG  ;
	N_OZA-PL  ;

LEXICON N_OZA-SG
:%{back%} NMN_OZA/SÄYNÄ-SG ;

LEXICON N_OZA-PL
:%{back%} NMN_OZA/SÄYNÄ-PL ;

LEXICON N_SÄYNÄ !!= @CODE@ säynä:säynä
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Front
!! stem final ä changes to i in Sg Par
!! stem final ä changes to 0 before i in Pl stem

: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; 
	N_SÄYNÄ-SG  ;
	N_SÄYNÄ-PL  ;

LEXICON N_SÄYNÄ-SG
:%{front%} NMN_OZA/SÄYNÄ-SG ;

LEXICON N_SÄYNÄ-PL
:%{front%} NMN_OZA/SÄYNÄ-PL ;

LEXICON N_KOIVU !!= @CODE@ koivu:koivu
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!! There are no changes in stem-final __u__
!! Plural stem in __loi__
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; 
        N_KOIVU-SG ;
        N_KOIVU-PL ;

LEXICON N_KOIVU-SG
:%{back%} NMN_KOIVU/HERY-SG        ;

LEXICON N_KOIVU-PL
:%{back%} NMN_KOIVU/HERY-PL        ;

LEXICON N_HERY !!= @CODE@ hery:hery
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Front
!! There are no	changes	in stem-final __y__
!! Plural stem in __löi__
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; 
        N_HERY-SG ;
        N_HERY-PL ;

LEXICON N_HERY-SG
:%{front%} NMN_KOIVU/HERY-SG        ;

LEXICON N_HERY-PL
:%{front%} NMN_KOIVU/HERY-PL        ;

LEXICON N_IDY !!= @CODE@ idy:idy
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Front
!! There are no changes in stem-final __y__
!! Plural stem in __löi__
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_IDY-SG ;
        N_IDY-PL ;

LEXICON N_IDY-SG
:%{front%} NMN_LUGU/IDY-SG        ;

LEXICON N_IDY-PL
:%{front%} NMN_LUGU/IDY-PL        ;

LEXICON N_LUGU !!= @CODE@ lugu:lugu
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Back
!! There are no changes in stem-final __u__
!! Plural stem in __loi__
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_LUGU-SG ;
        N_LUGU-PL ;

LEXICON N_LUGU-SG
:%{back%} NMN_LUGU/IDY-SG        ;

LEXICON N_LUGU-PL
:%{back%} NMN_LUGU/IDY-PL        ;

LEXICON N_RUNO !!= @CODE@ runo:runo
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!! Stem-fianl o changes to u in Sg Par
!! Plural stem in __loi__
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
	 N_RUNO-SG ;
	 N_RUNO-PL ;

LEXICON N_RUNO-SG
:%{back%} NMN_RUNO/HÖRÖ-SG   ;
LEXICON N_RUNO-PL
:%{back%} NMN_RUNO/HÖRÖ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_HÖRÖ !!= @CODE@ hörö:hörö
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Front
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
	 N_HÖRÖ-SG ;
	 N_HÖRÖ-PL ;

LEXICON N_HÖRÖ-SG
:%{front%} NMN_RUNO/HÖRÖ-SG   ;
LEXICON N_HÖRÖ-PL
:%{front%} NMN_RUNO/HÖRÖ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_RUADO !!= @CODE@ ruado:ruado
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Back
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
	 N_RUADO-SG ;
	 N_RUADO-PL ;

LEXICON N_RUADO-SG
:%{back%} NMN_RUADO/KYNDÖ-SG   ;
LEXICON N_RUADO-PL
:%{back%} NMN_RUADO/KYNDÖ-PL   ;

LEXICON adjectives
huaračin%<adj%>:huaračim A_SALBOIN  "haarakas" ;
kaikki%<adj%>:kaikk A_JÄLGI  "kaikki" ;
kačker%<adj%>:kačkera A_TAIGIN  "kitkerä" ;
lähin%<adj%>:lähi A_ENIN  "lähin" ;
lämmin%<adj%>:lämbi A_LÄMMIN  "lämmin" ;
sukkel%<adj%>:sukkel A_TAIGIN  "sukkela" ;
sydäin%<adj%>:sydäime A_SALBOIN  "(yougi:) sydämellinen" ;
vahnin%<adj%>:vahni A_ENIN  "vanhin" ;
važen%<adj%>:važe A_VAŽEN  "vasen" ;
LEXICON adverbs
hičoi%<adj%>d-A:hičoi ADA_  "aivan" ;
ei% viikokši%<adv%>:ei% viikokši ADV-TEMP_  "vähäksi aikaa" ;
jo%<adv%>:jo ADV-TEMP_  "jo" ;
joga% puolepäi%<adv%>:joga% puolepäi ADV-SPAT-IS-ALL  "kaikkialle" ;
kaikkiel%<adv%>:kaikkiel ADV-SPAT-IS-ADE  "kaikkialla" ;
kaikkiele%<adv%>:kaikkiele ADV-SPAT-IS-ALL  "kaikkialle" ;
kovaiänezesti%<adv%>:kovaiänezesti ADV_  "kovaäänisesti" ;
kui%<adv%>:kui ADV-INTERR-MANNER  "kuinka" ;
kusbo%<adv%>:kusbo ADV-INTERR-SPAT-IS-INE  "missä" ;
kuspäi%<adv%>:kuspäi ADV-INTERR-SPAT-IS-ELA  "mistä" ;
mahalleh%<adv%>:mahalleh ADV-IS-ELA-WITH-PXSG3  "mahallaan" ;
möllälleh%<adv%>:möllälleh ADV-IS-ELA-WITH-PXSG3  "silmistä: muljallaan" ;
puaksužeh%<adv%>:puaksužeh QNT-ITER  "usein" ;
sie%<adv%>:sie ADV-SPAT  "siellä" ;
siel%<adv%>:siel ADV-SPAT  "siellä" ;
siepäi%<adv%>:siepäi ADV-SPAT-IS-ABL  "sieltä" ;
silminnähten%<adv%>:silminnähten ADV-MANNER  "silminnähden" ;
silmän% tuan%<adv%>:silmän% tuan ADV_  "" ;
tuolpäi%<adv%>:tuolpäi ADV-SPAT-IS-ABL  "tuolta" ;
vaivažesti%<adv%>:vaivažesti ADV-MANNER  "vaivaisesti" ;
LEXICON Exceptions
tietiä%<vblex%>%<pri%>%<pri%>%<conneg%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:tietäh K ;
työndiä%<vblex%>%<pass%>PrfPrc:työtty K ;
konzutahto:konzu#tah ADV-INDEF-TEMP "" ;
konzutahto:konzu#tahto ADV-INDEF-TEMP "" ;
kuitahto:kui#tahto ADV-INDEF-MANNER "" ;
kustahto:kus#tahto ADV-INDEF-SPAT-IS-INE "" ;
kunnetahto:kunne#tahto ADV-INDEF-SPAT-IS-LAT "" ;
LEXICON nouns
ivyt%<n%>:ivyt N_IDY-PL  "maltaat" ;
kagluremeni%<n%>:kaglu#remeni N_HÄKKI  "kaulahihna" ;
kangaspuut%<n%>:kangas#puu N_KUU-PL  "kangaspuut" ;
kaččojienlava%<n%>:kaččojienlava N_KALA  "katsomo" ;
keskiyö%<n%>:keski#yö N_VYÖ  "keskiyö" ;
kezrävö%<n%>:kezrävö N_HÖRÖ-SG  "kehruu" ;
käzipuut%<n%>:käzi#puu N_KUU-PL  "kaide (portaissa ym.)" ;
lahjoitusmua%<n%>:lahjoitus#mua N_MUA  "lahjoitusmaa" ;
lannehluu%<n%>:lanneh#luu N_KUU  "lonkkaluu" ;
liygi%<n%>:liygi N_PAPPI  "livvi" ;
loga%<n%>:loga N_OZA-SG  "räkä" ;
löyly%<n%>:löyly N_HERY  "löyly" ;
meččuzvierit%<n%>+Err/Sub:mečču#zvieri N_LEIRI-PL  "metsän eläimet" ;
muaruavot%<n%>:mua#ruado N_RUADO-PL  "maatyöt" ;
mägiremenit%<n%>:mägi#remeni N_PAPPI-PL  "mäkivyöt" ;
nevesky%<n%>:nevesky N_  "miniä" ;
pada%<n%>:pada N_PADA  "uuniruukku" ;
piiri%<n%>:piiri N_LEIRI  "hallinnollinen alue" ;
pitkypiä%<n%>:pitkypiä N_PIÄ  "pitkäpää" ;
pletti%<n%>:pletti N_HÄKKI  "ruoska" ;
ponʼa%<n%>:ponʼa N_KALA-SG  "käsitys" ;
prokuazu%<n%>:prokuaza N_KALA  "kuje" ;
pruazniekkustola%<n%>:pruazniekku#stola N_OZA  "juhlapöytä" ;
pyhät%<n%>:pyhä N_OZA-PL  "(Herran) ehtoollinen" ;
pyy%<n%>:pyy N_PII  "pyy" ;
raba%<n%>:raba N-HUM_KALA  "raihnas vanhus" ;
rahat%<n%>:raha N_KALA-PL  "rahat" ;
regä%<n%>:re N_  "räkä" ;
rida%<n%>:rida N_PADA  "loukku" ;
silmänterä%<n%>:silmänterä N_SÄYNÄ  "silmäterä" ;
sinčot%<n%>:sinčot N_KALA-PL  "eteinen" ;
siä%<n%>:siä N_PIÄ  "sää" ;
suandukivut%<n%>:suandukivut N_KOIVU-PL  "synnytyskivut" ;
svuadʼbusobi%<n%>:svuadʼbu#sobi N_PAPPI  "hääpuku" ;
syväinyö%<n%>:syväinyö N_SUO  "keskiyö, sydänyö" ;
syy%<n%>:syy N_PII  "syy" ;
säilytändyruado%<n%>:säilytändy#ruado N_RUADO  "säilytystyö" ;
tagamua%<n%>:taga#mua N_MUA  "takamaa" ;
tukat%<n%>:tukat N_OZA-PL  "hiukset" ;
tukku%<n%>:tukku N_KOIVU  "läjä" ;
venä%<n%>:venä N_OZA-SG  "harv. venäjä" ;
venʼa%<n%>:venʼa N_KALA-SG  "venäjä" ;
virzut%<n%>:virzu N_RUNO-PL  "virsu" ;
vokalisobu%<n%>:vokali#sobu N_IDY-SG  "vokaalisointu" ;
vuo%<n%>:vuo N_SUO  "vuo" ;
žuaru%<n%>:žuaru N_KOIVU-SG  "kuumuus" ;
LEXICON N_NEWWORDS
kuardu:kuardu N_LUGU ;
linnanymbäristö:linnan#ymbäristö N_HÖRÖ ;
lähtötie:lähtö#tie N_VYÖ ;
maksokygy:makso#kygy N_IDY ;
siiričiajo:siiriči#ajo N_RUNO ;
sinki:sinki N_LEIRI ;
sirienipuu:sirieni#puu N_KUU ;
vezimualukuva:vezi#mualu#kuva N_OZA ;
